Utah statutes.
9-8-702.   Utah History Endowment Fund.

There is created a restricted special revenue fund known as the "Utah History Endowment Fund."  The state fund shall be administered by the Division of Finance in accordance with applicable law.  The state fund shall contain all money appropriated to it by the Legislature and the interest and other income earned on the fund.  The purpose of the state fund is to provide money to qualifying organizations to enable them to create their own history endowment funds.

